Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.120

Information about rights—Notice to noncustodial parent.

Whenever the child protective services worker is required to notify parents and children of their basic rights and other specific information as set forth in RCW 26.44.105 through 26.44.115, the child protective services worker shall also make a reasonable effort to notify the noncustodial parent of the same information in a timely manner.

[ 1985 c 183 s 5.]